Utah statutes.
53A-3-401.   Boards of education are bodies corporate -- Seal -- Authority to sue -- Conveyance of property.

(1)  The board of education of a school district is a body corporate under the name of the "Board of Education of .......... School District" (inserting the proper name), and shall have an official seal conformable to its name.

(2)  The seal is used by its business administrator in the authentication of all required matters.

(3)  A board may sue and be sued, and may take, hold, lease, sell, and convey real and personal property as the interests of the schools may require.

